Utah statutes.
76-10-1503.   Definitions.
As used in this act:
(1)  "Bus" means any passenger bus or coach or other motor vehicle having a
seating capacity of 15 or more passengers operated by a bus company for the
purpose of carrying passengers or cargo for hire and includes a transit
vehicle, as defined in Section 17B-2a-802, of a public transit district under
Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act.
(2)  "Bus company" or "company" means any person, group of persons or
corporation providing for-hire transportation to passengers or cargo by bus
upon the highways in the state, including passengers and cargo in interstate
or intrastate travel.  These terms also include local public bodies, public
transit districts, municipalities, public corporations, boards and commissions
established under the laws of the state providing transportation to passengers
or cargo by bus upon the highways in the state, whether or not for hire.
(3)  "Charter" means a group of persons, pursuant to a common purpose and
under a single contract, and at a fixed charge in accordance with a bus
company's tariff, which has acquired the exclusive use of a bus to travel
together to a specified destination or destinations.
(4)  "Passenger" means any person transported or served by a bus company,
including persons accompanying or meeting another being transported, any
person shipping or receiving cargo and any person purchasing a ticket or
receiving a pass.
(5)  "Terminal" means a bus station or depot or any other facility operated or
leased by or operated on behalf of a bus company and includes a transit
facility, as defined in Section 17B-2a-802, of a public transit district under
Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act.  This term
includes a reasonable area immediately adjacent to any designated stop along
the route traveled by any bus operated by a bus company and parking lots or
areas adjacent to terminals.
